Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Voting

48-17-201. Shareholders' list for meeting.

After fixing a record date for a meeting, a corporation shall prepare an alphabetical list of the names of all its shareholders who are entitled to notice of a shareholders' meeting. The list must be arranged by voting group (and within each voting group by class or series of shares) and show the address of and number of shares held by each shareholder, in each case as reflected in the records of the corporation.

The shareholders' list must be available for inspection by any shareholder, beginning two (2) business days after notice of the meeting is given for which the list was prepared and continuing through the meeting, at the corporation's principal office or at a place identified in the meeting notice in the city where the meeting will be held. A shareholder, or the shareholder's agent or attorney, is entitled on written demand to inspect and, subject to the requirements of § 48-26-102(c), to copy the list, during regular business hours and at such shareholder's or agent's expense, during the period it is available for inspection.

The corporation shall make the shareholders' list available at the meeting, and any shareholder, or the shareholder's agent or attorney, is entitled to inspect the list at any time during the meeting or any adjournment. If the right to vote at any meeting is challenged, the person presiding may rely on such list as evidence of the right of the person challenged to vote at such meeting.

If the corporation refuses to allow a shareholder, the shareholder's agent, or attorney to inspect the shareholders' list before or at the meeting (or copy the list as permitted by subsection (b)), a court of record having equity jurisdiction in the county where a corporation's principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is located, on application of the shareholder, may summarily order the inspection or copying at the corporation's expense and may postpone the meeting for which the list was prepared until the inspection or copying is complete.

Refusal or failure to prepare or make available the shareholders' list does not affect the validity of action taken at the meeting.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 7.20; 1994, ch. 776, § 23.

48-17-202. Voting entitlement of shares.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) or unless the charter provides otherwise, each outstanding share, regardless of class, is entitled to one (1) vote on each matter voted on at a shareholders' meeting. Except as provided in subsection (f), only shares are entitled to vote.

Absent special circumstances, the shares of a corporation are not entitled to vote if they are owned, directly or indirectly, by a second corporation, domestic or foreign, and the first corporation owns, directly or indirectly, a majority of the shares entitled to vote for directors of the second corporation, and no such shares shall be counted in determining the total number of outstanding shares of the corporation at any given time.

Subsection (b) does not limit the power of a corporation to vote any shares, including its own shares, held by it in a fiduciary capacity.

Redeemable shares are not entitled to vote after notice of redemption is mailed to the holders and a sum sufficient to redeem the shares has been deposited with a bank, trust company, or other financial institution under an irrevocable obligation to pay the holders the redemption price on surrender of the shares, and no such shares shall be counted in determining the total number of outstanding shares of the corporation at any given time.

Shares standing in the name of another corporation, domestic or foreign, may be voted by such officer, agent, or proxy as the bylaws of such corporation may prescribe or, in the absence of a bylaw provision, as the board of directors of such corporation may determine. The corporation whose shares are being voted may rely on the representations of such officer, agent, or proxy as to the authority unless such authority is questioned.

A corporation may in its charter confer upon the holders of any bonds, debentures or other debt obligations the power to vote in respect of its corporate affairs and management of the corporation to the extent and in the manner provided in the charter and may confer upon such holders of bonds, debentures or other debt obligations the same right of inspection of its books, accounts and other records, and also any other rights, which the shareholders of the corporation have or may have by reason of chapters 11-27 of this title or of its charter. If and to the extent the charter so provides, such holders shall be deemed to be shareholders, and their bonds, debentures or other debt obligations shall be deemed to be shares of stock, for the purpose of any provision of this title which requires the vote of shareholders as a prerequisite to any corporate action, and the charter may divest the holders of shares of capital stock, in whole or in part, of their right to vote on any corporate matter whatsoever, except as set forth in § 48-20-104.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 7.21; 1994, ch. 776, §§ 24, 25.

48-17-203. Proxies.

A shareholder may vote such shareholder's shares in person or by proxy.

Without limiting the manner in which a shareholder may authorize another person or persons to act for the shareholder as proxy pursuant to this section, the following shall constitute a valid means by which a shareholder may grant such authority:

A shareholder may execute a writing authorizing another person or persons to act for the shareholder as proxy. Execution may be accomplished by the shareholder personally signing such writing or by an attorney-in-fact in the case of an individual shareholder or by an authorized officer, director, employee, agent or attorney-in-fact in the case of any other shareholder signing such writing or causing the shareholder's signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including, but not limited to, facsimile signature;

A shareholder may authorize another person or persons to act for the shareholder as proxy by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or electronic transmission to the person who will be the holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service organization or like agent duly authorized by the person who will be the holder of the proxy to receive such transmission; provided, that any such telegram, cablegram, or electronic transmission shall either set forth or be submitted with information from which it can be determined that the telegram, cablegram, or electronic transmission was authorized by the shareholder. If it is determined that such telegrams, cablegrams, or electronic transmissions are valid, the inspectors or, if there are no inspectors, such other persons making such determination shall specify the information upon which they relied;

Any copy, electronic transmission or other reliable reproduction of such writing or transmission may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or transmission could be used; provided, that such copy, electronic transmission or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.

An appointment of a proxy is effective when received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes. An appointment is valid for eleven (11) months unless another period is expressly provided in the appointment form.

An appointment of a proxy is revocable by the shareholder unless the appointment form conspicuously states that it is irrevocable and the appointment is coupled with an interest. Appointments coupled with an interest include the appointment of:

A pledgee;

A person who purchased or agreed to purchase the shares;

A creditor of the corporation who extended it credit under terms requiring the appointment;

An employee of the corporation whose employment contract requires the appointment; or

A party to a voting agreement created under § 48-17-302.

In the case of a proxy not made irrevocable under subsection (d), the death or incapacity of the shareholder appointing a proxy does not affect the right of the corporation to accept the proxy's authority unless notice of the death or incapacity is received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes before the proxy exercises the proxy's authority under the appointment.

An appointment made irrevocable under subsection (d) becomes revocable when the interest with which it is coupled is extinguished.

A transferee for value of shares subject to an irrevocable appointment may revoke the appointment if the transferee did not know of its existence when such transferee acquired the shares and the existence of the irrevocable appointment was not noted conspicuously on the certificate representing the shares or on the information statement for shares without certificates.

Subject to § 48-17-205 and to any express limitation on the proxy's authority appearing on the face of the appointment form, a corporation is entitled to accept the proxy's vote or other action as that of the shareholder making the appointment.

Each fiduciary, including such acting as executor, administrator, guardian, committee, agent, or trustee, owning shares registered in such person's name as fiduciary, or in the name of another for the convenience of the fiduciary, whether the corporation issuing such shares is foreign or domestic, may, in addition to exercising the voting rights vested in such fiduciary, execute and deliver, or cause to be executed and delivered, a proxy or proxies in accordance with this section to others for the voting of such shares, but subject always to the following limitations:

If there are two (2) or more fiduciaries acting, the proxy shall be executed by, and voting instructions shall be issued by, agreement of all fiduciaries or a majority of them, and in the event of failure to obtain a majority, each of the fiduciaries shall vote the number of shares held by the fiduciaries divided by the number of fiduciaries; and

In the event the rights, manner or method of voting or the purpose to be accomplished is fixed by the instrument or instruments appointing the fiduciaries, the directions therein shall govern.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 7.22; 1994, ch. 776, §§ 26, 27; 1998, ch. 578, § 1; 2012, ch. 1051, §§ 25, 26.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-1104 — 5-1106.

Law Reviews.

Judicial Review of Defensive Tactics in Proxy Contests: When Is Using a Rights Plan Right? (Randall S. Thomas), 46 Vand. L. Rev. 503 (1993).

48-17-204. Shares held by nominees.

A corporation may establish a procedure by which the beneficial owner of shares that are registered in the name of a nominee is recognized by the corporation as the shareholder. The extent of this recognition may be determined in the procedure.

The procedure may set forth:

The types of nominees to which it applies;

The rights or privileges that the corporation recognizes in a beneficial owner;

The manner in which the procedure is selected by the nominee;

The information that must be provided when the procedure is selected;

The period for which selection of the procedure is effective; and

Other aspects of the rights and duties created.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 7.23.

48-17-205. Corporation's acceptance of votes.

If the name signed on a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment corresponds to the name of a shareholder, the corporation if acting in good faith is entitled to accept the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the shareholder.

If the name signed on a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment does not correspond to the name of its shareholder, the corporation if acting in good faith is nevertheless entitled to accept the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the shareholder if:

The shareholder is an entity and the name signed purports to be that of an officer or agent of the entity;

The name signed purports to be that of an administrator, executor, guardian, or conservator representing the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of fiduciary status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

The name signed purports to be that of a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of this status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

The name signed purports to be that of a pledgee, beneficial owner, or attorney-in-fact of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence acceptable to the corporation of the signatory's authority to sign for the shareholder has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment; or

Two (2) or more persons are the shareholder as cotenants or fiduciaries and the name signed purports to be the name of at least one (1) of the co-owners and the person signing appears to be acting on behalf of all the co-owners.

The corporation is entitled to reject a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment if the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes, acting in good faith, has reasonable basis for doubt about the validity of the signature on it or about the signatory's authority to sign for the shareholder.

The corporation and its officer or agent who accepts or rejects a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section are not liable in damages to the shareholder for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

Corporate action based on the acceptance or rejection of a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment under this section is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 7.24.

48-17-206. Quorum and voting requirements for voting groups.

Shares entitled to vote as a separate voting group may take action on a matter at a meeting only if a quorum of those shares exists with respect to that matter. Unless the charter or chapters 11-27 of this title provide otherwise, a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the matter by the voting group constitutes a quorum of that voting group for action on that matter. If a quorum of the shares entitled to vote as a voting group shall fail to be obtained at any meeting, the chair of the meeting or the holders of a majority of the shares of such voting group who are present, in person or by proxy, may adjourn the meeting to another place, date or time and no notice of such place, date or time need be given except as required in § 48-17-105(e).

Once a share is represented for any purpose at a meeting, it is deemed present for quorum purposes for the remainder of the meeting and for any adjournment of that meeting unless a new record date is or must be set for that adjourned meeting.

If a quorum exists, action on a matter (other than the election of directors) by a voting group is approved if the votes cast within the voting group favoring the action exceed the votes cast opposing the action, unless the charter or chapters 11-27 of this title requires a greater number of affirmative votes.

A charter amendment adding, changing, or deleting a quorum or voting requirement for a voting group greater than specified in subsection (a) or (c) is governed by § 48-17-208.

The election of directors is governed by § 48-17-209.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 7.25; 1994, ch. 776, § 28.

48-17-207. Action by single and multiple voting groups.

If the charter or chapters 11-27 of this title provide for voting by a single voting group on a matter, action on that matter is taken when voted upon by the voting group as provided in § 48-17-206.

If the charter or chapters 11-27 of this title provide for voting by two (2) or more voting groups on a matter, action on that matter is taken only when voted upon by each of those voting groups counted separately as provided in § 48-17-206. Action may be taken by one (1) voting group on a matter even though no action is taken by another voting group entitled to vote on the matter.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 7.26.

48-17-208. Greater quorum or voting requirements.

The charter may provide for a greater quorum or voting requirement for shareholders (or voting groups of shareholders) than is provided for by chapters 11-27 of this title.

An amendment to the charter that adds, changes, or deletes a greater quorum or voting requirement shall meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same vote and voting groups required to take action under the quorum and voting requirements then in effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 7.27.

48-17-209. Voting for directors — Cumulative voting.

Unless otherwise provided in the charter, directors are elected by a plurality of the votes cast by the shares entitled to vote in the election at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

Shareholders do not have a right to cumulate their votes for directors unless the charter so provides.

A statement included in the charter that “(all) (a designated voting group of) shareholders are entitled to cumulate their votes for directors” (or words of similar import) means that the shareholders designated are entitled to multiply the number of votes they are entitled to cast by the number of directors for whom they are entitled to vote and cast the product for a single candidate or distribute the product among two (2) or more candidates.

Shares otherwise entitled to vote cumulatively may not be voted cumulatively at a particular meeting unless:

The meeting notice or proxy statement accompanying the notice states conspicuously that cumulative voting is authorized; or

A shareholder who has the right to cumulate that shareholder's votes gives notice to the corporation no fewer than forty-eight (48) hours before the time set for the meeting of that shareholder's intent to cumulate that shareholder's votes during the meeting, and if one (1) shareholder gives this notice, all other shareholders in the same voting group participating in the election are entitled to cumulate their votes without giving further notice.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 7.28.

48-17-210. Shareholders presumed sui juris.

A corporation may treat any of its shareholders as sui juris until written notice to the contrary is received by the corporation.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 7.29.